Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2180.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Foreign
Principal Lobbying Oversight Act”.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 291.5 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

A. As used in this act:
1. “Agent” means a person representing, acting, or lobbying for
compensation on behalf of a foreign principal to influence the laws,
policies, or regulations of this state or its political
subdivisions; secure funding or incentives for the benefit of a
foreign principal; or solicit, collect, or disburse contributions,
loans, or other funds on behalf of a foreign principal. Agent shall
not include:
a. diplomatic or consular officers, staff members of a
diplomatic or consular officer, or officials of a
foreign government,
b. attorneys representing a foreign country, government,
political party, or corporation or business entity
with a fifty-one percent (51%) or greater interest
that is owned by a foreign country, government, or
political party in purely commercial endeavors or
legal proceedings before state or federal courts,
agencies, or other political subdivisions, or
c. any news or press service or association or any
newspaper, magazine, periodical, or other publication;
and
2. “Foreign principal” means a foreign country, government,
high-ranking government official, political party, or business
entity with a fifty-one percent (51%) or greater interest that is
owned or controlled by a foreign country, government, high-ranking
government official, or political party.
B. Any agent for a foreign principal shall register and submit
a completed filing with the Secretary of State within fifteen (15)
days of becoming an agent for a foreign principal and pay a fee
pursuant to Section 1142 of Title 18 of the Oklahoma Statutes. A
completed filing shall include the identity of the agent and the
foreign principal compensating the agent, the beginning and ending
date, if known, of the agency agreement with the foreign principal,
the nature of the lobbying the agent is conducting for the foreign
ENR. S. B. NO. 2180 Page 2

principal, and any other information deemed necessary by the
Secretary of State.
C. An agent for a foreign principal shall notify the Secretary
of State within ten (10) business days of any changes to information
submitted pursuant to subsection B of this section. An agent shall
submit a termination notice with the Secretary of State within ten
(10) business days of ceasing representation for a foreign
principal.
D. The Secretary of State shall cause a list of registrations
and filings of agents for foreign principals submitted pursuant to
subsection B of this section to be published on its website and
shall periodically communicate to elected officials how to access
such list. The Secretary of State may promulgate rules and
procedures as necessary to effectuate the provisions of this act.
E. This act shall not apply to:
1. Religious or charitable organizations registered with the
Secretary of State or that are exempt from taxation pursuant to the
provisions of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C., Section
501(c)(3);
2. Persons engaged in activities benefitting religious,
scholastic, academic, scientific, or fine arts interests; or
3. Persons involved in private and nonpolitical activities in
furtherance of a bona fide trade or commerce of the foreign
principal.
F. Any person who willfully or knowingly violates any provision
of this act, willfully or knowingly makes a false statement of any
material fact, or willfully or knowingly omits any material fact
required by this act shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a
misdemeanor and subject to a fine of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00).
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. S. B. NO. 2180 Page 3

Passed the Senate the 23rd day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 2180 Page 4